District of Columbia statutes.
28:6-112

Repealed

Compliance with section 47-4461.

Repealed.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 407(b), 48 DCR 334
Oct. 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-215, § 31, 61 DCR 13083
Notice of bulk sale, § 47-4461.

Section 410 (f) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 407 shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.